District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.08

Council authorized to fix water rates.

Repealed.

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 101, ch. 218, title I, § 101
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, § 501
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1931, Pub. L. 91-650, title I, § 105(a)
Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VII, § 706, 22 DCR 2118
July 23, 1992, D.C. Law 9-134, § 112(e), 39 DCR 4066
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 113(b), 39 DCR 4895
repealed pursuant to § 303 of D.C. Law 11-111

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1524.
1973 Ed., § 43-1520c.

Prior Codifications

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 303 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.

Editor's Notes